North Dakota, session 69, SB2050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-12-24 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. A state crime laboratory is created as a division of the office of the attorney general. This
division consists of a director, the state toxicologist, and such other personnel as may be
appointed by the attorney general. The state crime laboratory may establish and charge fees
for services rendered. The state crime laboratory must be administratively separated from the
bureau of criminal investigation. The director serves at the pleasure of the attorney general
and is entitled to receive a salary set by the attorney general within the limits of legislative
appropriation.

S. B. NO. 2050 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2050.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 3 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State